Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1201.12
Department; plans, contracts, funds; tax credit programs; duties.

The department shall:

(1) Submit and adopt all necessary plans, enter into contracts, and accept gifts, grants, and federal funds; and

(2) Administer the tax credit programs established by the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act and the Community Development Assistance Act and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to such acts.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB1344, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 58.

Community Development Assistance Act, see section 77-2913.

Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act, see section 77-3113.